Missouri, session 2026, SB907.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
2
one new section, to be known as section 537.1250, to read as
3
follows:
1
537.1250. 1. (1) This section shall be known and may
2
be cited as the "A c t Ag a inst Abusive Website or Web Content
3
Access Litigation".
4
(2) As used in this section, the following terms mean:
5
(a) "Access violation", any allegation that a website
6
or web c o ntent fails to comply with the accessibility
7
requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act
8
or under state law;
9
(b) "Resident of this state", any individual residing
10
in Misso u ri; any entity that has registered with the
11
Missouri secretary of state's office; or the state of
12
Missouri or any political subdivision thereof, including all

HCS SS SCS SBs 907, 2
1154 & 1272
13
boards, commissions, agencies, institutions, authorities,
14
and bodies politic and corporate of the state created by or
15
in accordance with state law or regulations.
16
2. (1) The attorney general under section 507.070 on
17
behalf o f a c lass of residents of this state who are subject
18
to litigation that alleges any website or web content access
19
violation, or any resident of this state who is subject to
20
litigation that alleges any website or web content access
21
violation, may file a civil action in any court of competent
22
jurisdiction within this state against the party, attorney,
23
or law firm that initiated such litigation for a
24
determination as to whether such litigation alleging a
25
website or web content access violation is abusive
26
litigation.
27
(2) In determining whether any litigation that alleges
28
any webs i te or web content access violation constitutes
29
abusive litigation, the court shall consider the totality of
30
the circumstances to determine if the primary purpose of the
31
litigation that alleges a website or web content access
32
violation is obtaining a payment from a defendant due to the
33
costs of defending the action in court. For the purposes of
34
making this determination, the court ma y assess the
35
following factors and any other factors the court deems
36
relevant for assessing:
37
(a) Whether the same plaintiff, attorney, or law firm
38
has file d a high number of substantially similar lawsuits
39
without meaningful efforts to resolve or improve
40
accessibility;
41
(b) Whether the plaintiff provided the defendant with
42
reasonab l e notice and an opportunity to correct the alleged
43
barrier prior to filing suit;

HCS SS SCS SBs 907, 3
1154 & 1272
44
(c) Any history of sanctions or findings of bad faith
45
against t he plaintiff or counsel;
46
(d) The nature of settlement discussions and the
47
reasonab l eness of settlement offers and refusals to settle.
48
The application of such settlement information shall be use d
49
only as provided by this section and shall not otherwise
50
alter the rules of evidence applicable to such court; and
51
(e) Whether any factors under Missouri supreme court
52
rule 55. 0 3(b) exist in the litigation and whether sanctions
53
are appropriate under Missouri supreme court rule 55.03(c).
54
(3) A defendant who receives written notice of an
55
alleged w ebsite or web content access violation and in good
56
faith initiates substantial steps to correct it within
57
ninety days shall have a rebuttable presumption that any
58
subsequent claim for a website or web content access
59
violation is abusive. Nothing in this section shall be
60
construed to prohibit a defendant from filing a motion to
61
dismiss or from notifying the plaintiff, prior to the
62
expiration of the ninety-day period, that the alleged access
63
violation has been corrected in good faith. There shall not
64
be a rebuttable presumption that such litig a tion is abusive
65
litigation if the alleged website or web content access
66
violation is not corrected, as determined by the court,
67
within ninety days after being provided written notice or
68
being served a petition or complaint with sufficient detail
69
to identify and correct the alleged access violation. The
70
trier of fact shall not determine whether such litiga t ion is
71
abusive litigation until after such ninety-day period
72
expires or the alleged access violation is corrected, as
73
determined by the court, whichever occurs first. This
74
subdivision shall be known and may be cited as t h e "Safe
75
Harbor Provision".

HCS SS SCS SBs 907, 4
1154 & 1272
76
3. The attorney general may intervene or bring an
77
action o n behalf of Missouri residents or entities that are
78
the targets of abusive website or web content access
79
litigation as defined in this section. The attorney general
80
may also issue guidance or determinati o ns clarifying when
81
litigation practices are deemed abusive, but such
82
determinations shall not preclude legitimate accessibility
83
enforcement actions.
84
4. If the trier of fact determines that an initiator
85
of an a c tion under subsection 2 of this section is a
86
defendant in abusive litigation, the court may award
87
reasonable attorney's fees and costs in bringing the action
88
under subsection 2 of this section as well as defending
89
against the abusive litigation to be paid by the party
90
bringing the abusive litigation. In addition, the court may
91
award punitive damages or sancti o ns not to exceed three
92
times the amount of attorney's fees awarded by the court.
93
5. At the conclusion of the litigation alleging a
94
website or web content access violation, the court shall
95
review any determination that such litigation is abusive and
96
any award of attorney's fees under the Missouri supreme
97
court rules of professional conduct to determine the
98
reasonableness of the award before issuing a judgment.
99
6. If the United States Department of Justice issues
100
standar d s concerning website or web content accessibility
101
under Title III of the federal Americans with Disabilities
102
Act, 42 U.S.C. Sections 12181 to 12189, the attorney general
103
shall notify the revisor of statutes that such standards
104
have been issued. Upon receipt of such notification by the
105
revisor, the prov i sions of this section shall expire with
106
respect to any entity that has registered with the Missouri
107
secretary of state's office or the state of Missouri or any

HCS SS SCS SBs 907, 5
1154 & 1272
108
political subdivision thereof, including all boards,
109
commissions, agencies, institutions, authorities, and bodies
110
politic and corporate of the state created by or in
111
accordance with state law or regulations.
112
7. This section shall apply to litigation pending on
113
August 2 8, 2026. The provisions of subdivision (3) of
114
subsection 2 of t his section shall apply to any defendant in
115
any pending litigation on August 28, 2026, that has complied
116
with the requirements of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of
117
this section prior to August 28, 2026, or that is within the
118
ninety-day correction period after August 28, 2026.
